Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1166.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8-DHEALTH CARE WORKER PLATFORMSSection 801-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718192021 "Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Health care facility." A facility used to provide health care or related services."Health care worker." A health care professional or worker who provides health care or directly related services to patients, including professionals or workers who are providing a type of service to patients that does not require a license."Health care worker hour limit." A total of 32 hours in any calendar week, as regularly implemented for scheduling purposes by the health care facility, at a single health care facility."Health care worker platform." A person, corporation, partnership or association that operates or offers a platform and adheres to the operational requirements of section 804-D."Platform." An electronic platform, system or application through which health care workers can accept one or more shifts to perform health care related services at a health care facility.Section 802-D. Registration.(a) Registration requirements.--Each health care worker platform shall register with the department prior to operating a platform in this Commonwealth.(b) Application.--In the case of a health care worker platform operating in this Commonwealth as of the effective date of this subsection, the health care worker platform shall submit an application for registration to the department within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection. The health care worker platform may continue operating during the pendency of the application.(c) Application requirements.--An application for registration must contain the following:20250HB1166PN1292 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The name of each shareholder or owner of the health care worker platform with an ownership interest greater than 10%.(2) The name of each officer and director of the health care worker platform, or the name of each member and partner of the health care worker platform who are actively involved in the management of the health care worker platform.(3) The certificate of good standing of the health care worker platform.(4) The articles of incorporation or other establishing document of the health care worker platform.(5) A certification that the health care worker platform is aware of and will comply with the requirements of this chapter.(d) Application fee.--Each applicant for registration shall pay an application fee of $1,000.(e) Departmental review and decision.--The department shall review and issue a decision on each application for registration within 30 days of the submission of the application. The department shall approve the application and issue the registration if the applicant has submitted a complete application, paid the application fee and meets the registration requirements under this chapter.(f) Appeal.--The department shall allow an appeal of any decision not to approve an application of a health care worker platform.(g) Term.--A registration issued under this chapter to a health care worker platform is valid for one year from the date of issuance.(h) Renewal.--A health care worker platform shall renew a 20250HB1166PN1292 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration under this chapter by:(1) submitting a renewal application to the department and either certifying no information required for registration has changed or providing updated information as appropriate; and(2) paying a renewal fee of $1,000.(i) Renewal decision.--The department shall review and issue a decision on each application for renewal within 30 days of the submission of the application. The department shall approve the application and issue the renewal if the applicant has submitted a complete renewal application, paid the renewal fee and continues to meet the registration requirements under this chapter.(j) Appeal of renewal decision.--The department shall allow an appeal of any decision not to approve an application of a health care worker platform. The health care worker platform may continue to operate during the pendency of a renewal application or an appeal of a denial of a renewal application.(k) Departmental authority.--The department may deny, refuse to renew, revoke or suspend a health care worker platform registration for any of the following reasons:(1) Lack of financial solvency or suitability.(2) Failure to comply with the conditions or requirements that must be met to obtain and retain a registration.(3) Material failure to comply with any other requirement of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.(4) Knowingly providing a health care worker with an illegally or fraudulently obtained or issued diploma, 20250HB1166PN1292 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration, license, certificate or criminal records check.Section 803-D. Recordkeeping.(a) Record retention.--A health care worker platform shall retain records demonstrating the following:(1) Each health care worker using the platform:(i) Meets minimum applicable licensing, training and, where applicable, continuing education standards for the role or roles that the health care worker is seeking on the platform.(ii) Has completed and passed a criminal records check.(iii) Has passed an exclusion check from the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office of Inspector General.(iv) Has professional references.(2) Each health care worker using the platform who provides direct services to patients:(i) Has completed an annual physical.(ii) Has a current CPR certification.(3) The health care worker platform maintains occupational accident insurance that applies to the work of health care workers who attain work through the platform.(4) The health care worker platform maintains general liability and professional liability insurance.(b) Record retention period.--A health care worker platform shall retain the records required by subsection (a) for at least three years.Section 804-D. Operational requirements.(a) Employment status.--A health care worker shall be deemed to be an independent contractor and not an employee of a health 20250HB1166PN1292 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care worker platform or a health care facility for the purposes of all State and local laws, regulations, ordinances and resolutions if all of the following are met:(1) The health care worker platform and health care worker agree either in writing or electronically that the health care worker is an independent contractor for all work attained through the platform.(2) The health care worker platform allows each health care worker to decide whether to accept a shift at a health care facility without any requirement that a health care worker accepts a minimum number of shifts.(3) The health care worker platform allows each health care worker to agree, either in writing or electronically, to the hourly rates offered or set by the health care facility or the health care worker platform.(4) The health care worker may accept or reject work shifts with any health care facility without being penalized by the health care worker platform.(5) The health care worker platform does not require the health care worker to be available to accept or fulfill any particular work shifts during specific hours or on specific days.(6) The health care worker platform does not restrict the health care worker from engaging in any other occupation or business, including, but not limited to, health care work or health care related work.(7) The health care worker platform does not require the health care worker to use specific equipment, tools or other supplies.(8) The health care worker platform does not prescribe 20250HB1166PN1292 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or control the means and methods for the services performed by a health care worker at a health care facility.(9) The contract or other agreement between the health care worker and the health care worker platform may be terminated by either party with or without cause.(10) The health care worker is responsible for the payment of all Federal, State and local taxes on the health care worker's earnings derived from all services performed for health care facilities attained through the platform.(11) The health care worker does not work more than the health care worker hour limit for more than two consecutive seven-day periods.(b) Exception.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), if a health care worker exceeds the health care worker hour limit for more than two consecutive seven-day periods, the determination of that individual's employment status shall be governed by otherwise applicable law.(c) Prohibitions.--A health care worker platform may not conduct any of the following in operating the platform:(1) Require a health care worker to enter into a noncompete agreement with the platform.(2) Require a health care worker or health care facility to pay any fee or compensation to the platform if a health care worker accepts an offer of employment from a health care facility.(3) Restrict a health care worker from accepting shifts through another platform or from a health care facility that does not offer shifts on the platform, except that a health care worker platform may remove from the specific platform a health care worker who repeatedly accepts simultaneous shifts 20250HB1166PN1292 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on two different health care worker platforms.(4) Take adverse action against a health care worker due to the health care worker's membership or lack of membership in a labor organization.(d) Advertisement.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a health care worker platform from generally advertising to the public that the health care worker platform is seeking use of the platform by health care workers.Section 805-D. Exclusion.A health care worker platform that is registered under this chapter shall be excluded from the definition of "temporary health care services agency" in section 801-B.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1166PN1292 - 8 - 12345678910111213